Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1078.
do enact as follows:AB1078,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1078,28Section 2. 20.192 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1078,2,10920.192 (1) (d) Innovation grant program. Biennially, the amounts in the 10schedule for the innovation grant program under s. 238.147.AB1078,311Section 3. 238.147 of the statutes is created to read:AB1078,2,1412238.147 Innovation grants. (1) In this section, “institution of higher 13education” means a private nonprofit postsecondary institution that is a member of 14the Wisconsin Association of Independent Colleges and Universities.AB1078,2,1915(2) The corporation shall establish and administer an innovation grant 16program to provide to institutions of higher education funding for the development 17of new academic programs and community partnerships that are designed to meet 18workforce needs or infrastructure projects that benefit the broader public and are 19designed to meet workforce needs.AB1078,3,220(3) (a) Subject to pars. (b) and (c), from the appropriation under s. 20.192 (1) 21(d), the corporation shall award grants to institutions of higher education to support 22the launch of innovative academic programs that are designed to meet workforce 1needs or infrastructure projects that benefit the public and are designed to meet 2workforce needs.AB1078,3,53(b) The board may award a grant under par. (a) to an institution of higher 4education for an academic program or infrastructure project only if all of the 5following apply:AB1078,3,861. The institution of higher education provides matching funding for the 7academic program or infrastructure project in an amount at least equal to the 8amount of the grant.AB1078,3,1292. The institution of higher education demonstrates a pathway for the 10academic program or infrastructure project, through tuition, fees, or other related 11revenue, to become self-sustaining after the academic program or infrastructure 12project is established.AB1078,3,1513(c) The board may not award a grant under par. (a) if the grant would result in 14more than 10 percent of the total amount of the grants awarded under par. (a) being 15awarded to a single institution of higher education.AB1078,3,1616